Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.730

Community transition services program.

The department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules, policies, and procedures as may be needed to implement a community transition services program required by chapter 206, Laws of 2021, to include the following:

(1) Identification and regular monitoring of metrics of quality implementation for the community transition program, and regularly publishing outcome analyses for program participants; and

(2) Allowing for the use of new electronic home monitoring equipment and technologies as they become available that eliminate or minimize trauma, social stigma, and racial injustice, and imposing penalties for the knowing or intentional tampering, damaging, or destruction of equipment that renders it not fully functional.

[ 2021 c 206 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Appropriation—Rental vouchers—2021 c 206: See notes following RCW 72.01.412.